dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="pačm/aga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agy</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>age</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agu</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>age</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aga</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agou</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aga</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ág</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agám</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agy</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agách</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agy</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agami</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agy</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of pačm/aga__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ag</l>
        <r>aga<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- pačm/aga__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/urza__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzy</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urze</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzu</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urze</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urza</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzou</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urza</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úrz</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzám</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzy</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzách</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzy</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzami</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urzy</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of b/urza__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urz</l>
        <r>urza<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- b/urza__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/čaša__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaše</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaši</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čašu</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaši</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaša</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čašou</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaša</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaší</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ciaš</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čašiam</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaše</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čašiach</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaše</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čašami</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaše</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of /čaša__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čaš</l>
        <r>čaša<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- /čaša__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="čaša"><i></i><par n="/čaša__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burza"><i>b</i><par n="b/urza__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malaga"><i>mal</i><par n="pačm/aga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pačmaga"><i>pačm</i><par n="pačm/aga__n"/></e>
